California, session 20252026, AB1300.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 17.26 (commencing with Section 7284.3) is added to Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 17.26. California Data Protection and Privacy for All Communities Act7284.3. The Legislature finds and declares that the personally identifiable information of individuals who are part of vulnerable communities, particularly immigrants, must be safeguarded against unauthorized access and misuse by federal agencies. While existing laws such as the California Consumer Privacy Act provide foundational protections, further legislative measures are necessary to ensure that state and local government data collection and sharing practices do not compromise the privacy and security of at-risk populations. This chapter strengthens privacy safeguards, enhances regulatory oversight, and aligns data-sharing policies with California’s commitment to civil rights and privacy protections.7284.3.1. For purposes of this chapter, the following terms, have the following meanings:(a) “Government agency” means any state, local, or municipal government entity that collects, stores, or shares personally identifiable information.(b) “Immigration enforcement agencies” means United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), United States Customs and Border Protection (CBP), and any other federal agency responsible for immigration enforcement.(c) “Personally identifiable information” or “PII” includes, but is not limited to, immigration status, biometric data, driver’s license information, employment records, financial information, and any other data that can be used to identify an individual.7284.3.2. (a) A state or local government agency shall not collect immigration-related PII unless it is explicitly required by law to do so and the collection is justified by a legitimate government purpose.(b) A state or local government agency shall not share PII with federal immigration enforcement agencies without a judicial warrant or court order.(c) Any contract, agreement, or memorandum of understanding that facilitate data sharing between a state or local government agency and federal immigration enforcement authorities shall comply with strict oversight mechanisms that ensure compliance with civil rights and privacy protections and shall be subject to review pursuant to Section 7284.3.4.(d) This section may be enforced by administrative action or by imposition of a civil penalty recovered by an action brought by the Attorney General.7284.3.4. The State Auditor shall conduct audits of all state and local government agency data-sharing agreements at least every two years to ensure compliance with existing laws protecting privacy and civil rights.7284.3.5. (a) The Office of the Attorney General shall establish an oversight task force to review complaints and violations related to unauthorized state and local government agency data collection and sharing.(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5, the oversight task force shall report to the Legislature annually on data privacy trends, risks, and policy recommendations.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to amend the Government Code, relating to state government.